Utah statutes.
38-1a-205.   Building permit -- Transmission to registry -- Posting at project site.

(1) (a)  A county, city, or town issuing a building permit for a private project:

(i)  shall, no later than 15 days after issuing the permit, input the building permit application and transmit the building permit information to the registry electronically by way of the Internet or computer modem or by any other means; and

(ii)  may collect a building permit fee related to the issuance of the building permit, but may not spend or otherwise use the building permit fee until the county, city, or town complies with Subsection (1)(a)(i) with respect to the building permit for which the fee is charged.

(b)  The person to whom a building permit, filed under Subsection (1)(a), is issued is responsible for the accuracy of the information in the building permit.

(c)  For the purposes of classifying a record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, the division shall classify in the registry building permit information transmitted from a county, city, or town to the registry notwithstanding the classification of the building permit information by the county, city, or town.

(2)  At the time a building permit is obtained, each original contractor for construction service shall conspicuously post at the project site a copy of the building permit obtained for the project.

